Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1040.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1233b. (1) Subject to subsection (2) and except as provided in subsection (3), the board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy may engage a full-time or part-time noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher to teach a course in computer science, a foreign language, mathematics, biology, chemistry, engineering, physics, robotics, or in another subject area determined by the state board to be appropriate to be included under this section and so designated by the state board, or any combination of these subject areas, in grades 9 through to 12, or in an industrial technology education program or a career and technical education program. (2) Subject to subsections (3) and (6), a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher is qualified to teach under this section if he or she meets at least 1 of the following minimum requirements: (a) All of the following: (i) Possesses an earned bachelor's degree from an accredited postsecondary institution. (ii) Has a major or a graduate degree in the field of specialization in which he or she will teach. (iii) If the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher desires to teach for more than 1 year, has passed a subject area examination, if a subject area examination exists, in the field of specialization in which he or she will teach. (iv) Except in the case of individuals engaged to teach a foreign language, has, in the 5-year period immediately preceding the date of hire, not less than 2 years of occupational experience in the field of specialization in which he or she will teach. (b) For teaching a course in an industrial technology education program or a career and technical education program, is engaged to teach in a subject matter or field in which the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher has achieved expertise, as determined by the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy, and satisfies all of the following: (i) Has a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate as defined in section 4 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1604. (ii) For teaching in a subject matter or field in which a professional license or certification is required, at least 1 of the following: (A) Holds a professional license or certification in that same subject matter or field. (B) Previously held a professional license or certification in that same subject matter or field that expired no more than 2 years before the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher's initial employment under this section and was in good standing immediately before the license or certification expired. (iii) Has at least 2 cumulative years of professional experience in that same subject matter or field in the immediately preceding 10 years. (3) The requirements listed in subsection (2) for a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher engaged to teach under this section shall be are in addition to any other requirements established by the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy, as applicable. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall not engage a full-time or part-time noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher to teach a course described in subsection (1) if the district or public school academy is able to engage a certificated, endorsed teacher. (5) Subject to subsection (6), if the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is able to engage a certificated, endorsed teacher to teach a course described in subsection (1), the board or board of directors may employ or continue to employ a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher to teach the course if the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher meets at least 1 of the following: (a) Both of the following: (i) The noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher is annually and continually enrolled and completing credit in an approved teacher preparation program leading to a provisional teaching certificate. (ii) The noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher has a planned program leading to teacher certification on file with the employing school district or intermediate school district or public school academy, his or her teacher preparation institution, and the department. (b) Is engaged to teach in an industrial technology education program or a career and technical education program and meets the requirements under subsection (2)(b). (6) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy may employ a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher who meets the requirements of subsection (2)(b) to teach in an industrial technology education program or a career and technical education program for up to 10 years. The superintendent of public instruction may permit the board or board of directors to employ the teacher for more than 10 years.The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy may continue to employ a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher described in this subsection for more than 10 years with approval from any of the following, as applicable: (a) The superintendent of public instruction. (b) The superintendent of the intermediate school district that employs the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher. (c) The superintendent of the local education agency that employs the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher. (7) If the noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher completes 3 years of successful classroom teaching, as determined by regular observation and review by school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy personnel and teacher preparation institution personnel, the department and a teacher preparation institution shall utilize the teaching experience of a noncertificated, nonendorsed teacher for the purpose of waiving student teaching as a condition for receiving a continued employment authorization in the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy and a provisional teaching certificate. (8) An individual engaged to teach under this section is subject to the requirements of sections 1526 and 1527.